apertium-mvf.mvf.twol
!"{ᠠ} is front unrounded after first-initial [non-transparent] ᠢ"
!%{ᠠ%}:ᠡ <=> .#. [ :NonVow/:0 ]* :ᠢ [ :NonVow/:0 ]* [ :ᠲ | :ᠳ | :ᠰ ]/:0 _ ;

!"{ᠠ} is front unrounded after first-initial [non-transparent] ᠢ"
!%{ᠠ%}:ᠡ <=> .#. [ :NonVow/:0 ]* :ᠢ [ :NonVow/:0 ]* [ :NonVow ]/:0 _ :NonVow/:0 [ .#. | %  ] ;

"{ᠠ} after palatal cons"
%{ᠠ%}:ᠢ <=> :PalConsA/[ :0 - ᠢ: ] _ ;
            ᠢ:/[ :0 - ᠢ:0 ] _ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/:0* [ :Vow | .#. | %  ] ;
            ᠢ:/[ :0 - ᠢ:0 ] _ [ ᠬ: | ᠨ: | ᠸ: ] ;
        except
            :PalConsA _ [ [ :ᠯ | :ᠨ ] :Vow ]/:0 ;
!@ ᠣ:ᠣ ᠷ:ᠷ ᠢ:0 {ᠠ}:ᠢ {ᠨ}:ᠨ _:_ ᠳ:ᠳ {ᠠ}:ᠠ ᠬ:ᠬ {ᠢ}:ᠢ

"ᠢ deletion before {ᠠ}"
ᠢ:0 <=> _ %{ᠠ%}:ᠢ/[:0 - [ %{ᠠ1%}: | %{ᠢ%}: | %{ᠦ%}: ] ] ;
!        _ %>: %{ᠠ%}: %{ᠠ%}: ;
    except
        _ [ %{ᠠ%}: | %{ᠢ%}: | %{ᠦ%}: ]/:0 ;
        _ [ :Voiced ]/:0 ;

"ᠢ becomes ᠢ before {ᠠ1} and ᠮᠨᠭᠯᠪᠸᠷ"
ᠢ:ᠢ <=> _ [ %{ᠠ1%}: | %{ᠢ%}: | %{ᠦ%}: ]/:0 ;
        _ [ :Voiced ]/:0 ;
    except
        _ [ %{ᠠ%}: ]/[ :0 - [ %{ᠠ%}: ] ] ;
        ! let things like ᠣᠷᠢ>{ᠠ}{ᠨ}ᠳ be taken care of by {ᠠ}:ᠢ not ᠢ:ᠢ


!!!! MISC !!!!

"{ᠢ} appears with back-vowels"
%{ᠢ%}:ᠢ <=> %{ᠠ%}:BackVow :NonVow (:NonVow*) _ ;

"{ᠸ} surfaces as ᠪ after ᠯ, nasals, and ᠸ"
%{ᠸ%}:ᠪ <=> [ :ᠸ | :Nasal | :ᠯ ]/[ :0 | %  | ᠢ:ᠢ ]* _ ;

"{ᠳ} devoices after some stuff"
%{ᠳ%}:ᠲ <=> [ :ᠭ | :ᠷ | :ᠸ ]/[ :0 - %{ᠢ%}:0 ] _ ;

"{ᠵ} devoices sometimes"
%{ᠵ%}:ч <=> [ :ᠭ | :ᠷ | :ᠸ ] [ :0 - %{ᠢ%}:0 ]* _ ;

"{ᠷ} dissimilates to ᠯ after ᠷ"
%{ᠷ%}:ᠯ <=> [ :ᠷ (:ᠢ) ]/[ :0 | %  ] _ ;

!!!! extra {ᠨ} stuff !!!!

"{ᠨ} surfaces after diphthongs in non-ExtraN plural morpheme"
%{ᠨ%}:ᠨ <=> :Vow :ᠢ/:0 _ %{ᠣ%}: %{ᠣ%}: ;

!"{ᠨ} surfaces at the end of a triggers deletion of genitive-final ᠨ"
!ᠨ:0 <=> %{ᠨ%}:ᠨ %{I%}: %{ᠢ%}: _ ;

"genitive-final ᠨ deletes after regular noun stems ending in ᠨ"
ᠨ:0 <=> [ :ᠨ - %{ң%}: ] %>: %{ᠭ%}: %{I%}: %{ᠢ%}: _ ;

"{ᠨ} in regular plural is ᠭ after {ᠨ}-final stems"
%{ᠨ%}:ᠭ <=> %{ᠨ%}:ᠨ/:0 _ ;


!!!! extra {ᠨ} noun phonology !!!!

"{ᠨ} deletes in dative after diphthongs"
%{ᠨ%}:0 <=> :Vow :ᠢ %>: %{ᠠ%}: _ ᠳ ;
